02_Morphology/midterm.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<v%>     ! Verb
%<tv%>    ! Transitive Verb
%<perf%>  ! Perfect
%<s_sg1%> ! Subject 1st Person singular
%<s_sg2%> ! Subject 2nd person Singular
%<s_sg3%> ! Subject 3rd person singular
%<s_pl1%> ! Subject 1st person plural
%<s_pl2%> ! subject 2nd person plural
%<s_pl3%> ! subject 3rd person plural
%<o_sg1%> ! object 1st person singular
%<o_sg1%> ! object 2nd person singular
%<o_sg3%> ! object 3rd person singular
%<o_pl1%> ! object 1st person plural
%<o_pl2%> ! object 2nd person plural
%<o_pl3%> ! object 3rd person plural

@U.TAM.perf@            

@U.S_AGR.SG1@
@U.S_AGR.SG2@
@U.S_AGR.SG3@
@U.S_AGR.PL1@
@U.S_AGR.PL2@
@U.S_AGR.PL3@

@U.O_AGR.SG1@
@U.O_AGR.SG2@
@U.O_AGR.SG3@
@U.O_AGR.PL1@
@U.O_AGR.PL2@
@U.O_AGR.PL3@

%{a%}

%>

LEXICON Root

Aspect ;

LEXICON Aspect 

@U.TAM.perf@:@U.TAM.perf@x%{a%}%> AgrO ; 

LEXICON AgrO

@U.O_AGR.SG1@:@U.O_AGR.SG1@ AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.SG2@:@U.O_AGR.SG2@ AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.SG3@:@U.O_AGR.SG3@ AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.PL1@:@U.O_AGR.PL1@ AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.PL2:@U.O_AGR.PL2@ AgrS ;
@U.O_AGR.PL3@:@U.O_AGR.PL3@ AgrS ;

LEXICON AgrS 

@U.S_AGR.SG1@:@U.S_AGR.SG1@ IV ;
@U.S_AGR.SG2@:@U.S_AGR.SG2@ IV ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ IV ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@:@U.S_AGR.PL1@ IV ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@:@U.S_AGR.PL2@ IV ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ IV ; 

LEXICON Person_O

@U.O_AGR.SG1@%<o_sg1%>:@U.O_AGR.SG1@ # ; 
@U.O_AGR.SG2@%<o_sg2%>:@U.O_AGR.SG2@ # ;
@U.O_AGR.SG3@%<o_sg3%>:@U.O_AGR.SG3@ # ;
@U.O_AGR.PL1@%<o_pl1%>:@U.O_AGR.PL1@ # ;
@U.O_AGR.PL2@%<o_pl2%>:@U.O_AGR.PL2@ # ;
@U.O_AGR.PL3@%<o_pl3%>:@U.O_AGR.PL3@ # ;

LEXICON Person_S

@U.S_AGR.SG1@%<s_sg1%>:@U.S_AGR.SG1@ Person_O # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG2@%<s_sg2%>:@U.S_AGR.SG2@ Person_O # ;
@U.S_AGR.SG3@%<s_sg3%>:@U.S_AGR.SG3@ Person_O # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL1@%<s_pl1%>:@U.S_AGR.PL1@ Person_O # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL2@%<s_pl2%>:@U.S_AGR.PL2@ Person_O # ;
@U.S_AGR.PL3@%<s_pl3%>:@U.S_AGR.PL3@ Person_O # ;

LEXICON Asp 

@U.TAM.perf@%<perf%>:@U.TAM.perf@ Person_S ; 

LEXICON V-IV 

%<v%>%<tv%>: Asp ;

LEXICON IV 

tzʼät:tzʼät V-IV  ; ! "to see"
